deutsch.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N
+V
+Adj
+M
+F
+Nt
+Sg
+Pl
+1P
+2P
+3P
+Nom
+Acc
+Dat
+Gen
+Inf
+Part1
+Part2
+Ind
+Subj
+Cond
+Impe
+Pres
+Imperf
+Perf
+Pluperf
+Fut
+Futperf
+Pos
+Comp
+Super
GE+
@P.GE.ON@
@D.GE@
@C.GE@

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Prefix ;
Adjective ;

LEXICON Noun

junge	Njunge;
bursche	Njunge;
knabe	Njunge;
bube	Njunge;
kunde	Njunge;
neffe	Njunge;
russe	Njunge;
schwede	Njunge;
soziologe	Njunge;
löwe	Njunge;
rabe	Njunge;
schimpanse	Njunge;
bauer	Njunge;
wille	Nwille;
name	Nwille;
elefant	Nelefant;
emigrant Nelefant;
präsident	Nelefant;
kapitalist	Nelefant;
kommunist	Nelefant;
diplomat	Nelefant;
astronaut	Nelefant;
kandidat	Nelefant;
kamerad	Nelefant;
bär	Nelefant;
held	Nelefant;
mensch	Nelefant;
pilot	Nelefant;
idiot	Nelefant;
architekt	Nelefant;
demokrat	Nelefant;
käse	Nkäse;
benutzer	Nkäse;
nachbar	Nnachbar;
lehrling	Nlehrling;
boss	Nlehrling;
konzern	Nlehrling;
wohnung	Nwohnung;	
fähigkeit Nwohnung;
lehrerin	Nlehrerin;
kamera	Nkamera;
chance Nchance;
radio	Nradio;
herz	Nherz;
kraft	Nkraft;
mutter	Nmutter;
staat	Nstaat;
bild	Nbild;
berg	Nberg;

LEXICON Prefix

@P.GE.ON@GE+:@P.GE.ON@ge Verb;
Verb;

LEXICON Verb

lieb Vlieben;
mach Vlieben;
kauf Vlieben;
sag Vlieben;
handel Vhandeln;
sammel Vhandeln;
ermittel Vhandeln;
wurzel Vhandeln;
spiegel Vhandeln;
arbeit Varbeiten;
wart Varbeiten;
bedeut Varbeiten;
antwort Varbeiten;
fahr Vfahren;

LEXICON Adjective

neu	Aneu;
klein	Aneu;
lang	Aneu;
groß	Aneu;
langweilig	Aneu;
euphorisch	Aneu;
toll	Aneu;
wunderbar	Aneu;
glücklich	Aneu;
schön	Aneu;
schnell Aneu;

LEXICON Njunge

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:n	#;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:n	#;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:n	#;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:n	#;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:n	#;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:n	#;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:n	#;

LEXICON Nwille

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:n    #;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:n    #;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:ns	#;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:n    #;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:n    #;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:n    #;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:n    #;

LEXICON Nelefant

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:en	#;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:en	#;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:en	#;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:en	#;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:en	#;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:en	#;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:en	#;

LEXICON Nkäse

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:s    #;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:0    	#;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:0	#;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:n    #;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:0	#;

LEXICON Nnachbar

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:s    #;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:n    #;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:n    #;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:n    #;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:n    #;

LEXICON Nlehrling

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:0	#;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:s    #;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:e    #;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:e    #;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:en	#;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:e    #;

LEXICON Nwohnung

+N+F+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Acc:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Dat:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Gen:0	#;
+N+F+Pl+Nom:en	#;
+N+F+Pl+Acc:en	#;
+N+F+Pl+Dat:en   #;
+N+F+Pl+Gen:en	#;

LEXICON Nlehrerin

+N+F+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Acc:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Dat:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Gen:0     #;
+N+F+Pl+Nom:nen	#;
+N+F+Pl+Acc:nen	#;
+N+F+Pl+Dat:nen  #;
+N+F+Pl+Gen:nen	#;

LEXICON Nkamera

+N+F+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Acc:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Dat:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Gen:0     #;
+N+F+Pl+Nom:s	#;
+N+F+Pl+Acc:s	#;
+N+F+Pl+Dat:s	#;
+N+F+Pl+Gen:s	#;

LEXICON Nchance

+N+F+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Acc:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Dat:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Gen:0     #;
+N+F+Pl+Nom:n    #;
+N+F+Pl+Acc:n    #;
+N+F+Pl+Dat:n    #;
+N+F+Pl+Gen:n    #;


LEXICON Nradio

+N+Nt+Sg+Nom:0	#;
+N+Nt+Sg+Acc:0	#;
+N+Nt+Sg+Dat:0	#;
+N+Nt+Sg+Gen:s	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Nom:s	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Acc:s	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Dat:s	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Gen:s	#;


LEXICON Nherz

+N+Nt+Sg+Nom:0    #;
+N+Nt+Sg+Acc:0    #;
+N+Nt+Sg+Dat:en	#;
+N+Nt+Sg+Dat:e	#;
+N+Nt+Sg+Gen:es	#;
+N+Nt+Sg+Gen:ens	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Nom:en	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Acc:en	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Dat:en	#;
+N+Nt+Pl+Gen:en	#;

LEXICON Nkraft

+N+F+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Acc:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Dat:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Gen:0     #;
+N+F+Pl+Nom:^e    #;
+N+F+Pl+Acc:^e    #;
+N+F+Pl+Dat:^en	#;
+N+F+Pl+Gen:^e    #;

LEXICON Nmutter

+N+F+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Acc:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Dat:0     #;
+N+F+Sg+Gen:0     #;
+N+F+Pl+Nom:^1    #;
+N+F+Pl+Acc:^1    #;
+N+F+Pl+Dat:^n #;
+N+F+Pl+Gen:^1    #;

LEXICON Nstaat

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0     #;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:0   #;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:0   #;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:e	#;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:s    #;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:es	#;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:en    #;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:en    #;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:en    #;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:en    #;

LEXICON Nbild

+N+Nt+Sg+Nom:0  #;
+N+Nt+Sg+Acc:0  #;
+N+Nt+Sg+Dat:0  #;
+N+Nt+Sg+Dat:e  #;
+N+Nt+Sg+Gen:s #;
+N+Nt+Sg+Gen:es #;
+N+Nt+Pl+Nom:er #;
+N+Nt+Pl+Acc:er #;
+N+Nt+Pl+Dat:ern #;
+N+Nt+Pl+Gen:er #;

LEXICON Nberg

+N+M+Sg+Nom:0  #;
+N+M+Sg+Acc:0  #;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:0  #;
+N+M+Sg+Dat:e  #;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:s #;
+N+M+Sg+Gen:es #;
+N+M+Pl+Nom:e #;
+N+M+Pl+Acc:e #;
+N+M+Pl+Dat:en #;
+N+M+Pl+Gen:e #;

LEXICON Vlieben

@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@st	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@t	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@t	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@test   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@tet    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@est       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@et        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@test   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@tet    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@e   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@e   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@t    #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Inf:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Part1:@D.GE@end  #;
+V+Part2:t	#;

LEXICON Vhandeln

@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@st	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@t	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@n	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@t	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@n	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@test   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@tet    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@n   #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@st       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@n       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@t        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@n       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@test   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@te    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@tet    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@ten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@n   #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+1P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+2P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+3P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+1P:t       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+2P:t        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+3P:t       #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@n    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@e   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@t    #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@n   #;
@D.GE@+V+Inf:@D.GE@n	#;
@D.GE@+V+Part1:@D.GE@nd  #;
+V+Part2:t	#;
